Utah statutes.
48-2c-214.   Fees.

Unless otherwise provided by statute, the division shall collect fees for its services in amounts determined by the department in accordance with the provisions of Section 63J-1-504.



Amended by Chapter 141, 2009 General Session 

Repealed by Chapter 353, 2011 General Session

